New York, session 2025-2026, S2299.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 243 of the general business law, as amended by 2 chapter 843 of the laws of 1980, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 243. Aircraft; construction, design and airworthiness; federal 4 registration. 1. The public safety requiring, and the advantages of 5 uniform regulation making it desirable, in the interest of aeronautical 6 progress, that aircraft to be avigated within this state should conform, 7 with respect to design, construction and airworthiness, to standards 8 prescribed by the United States government with respect to avigation of 9 aircraft subject to its jurisdiction, it shall be unlawful for any 10 person to avigate an aircraft within this state unless it is licensed 11 and registered by the department of transportation of the United States 12 in the manner prescribed by the lawful rules and regulations of the 13 United States government then in force. The license for such aircraft 14 must be carried and conspicuously posted in the aircraft while in 15 flight. Such license also shall be presented for inspection, on demand, 16 to any peace officer, acting pursuant to his special duties, or police 17 officer, or to any official, manager or person in charge of an airport 18 or landing place where the aircraft may be. 19 2. It shall be unlawful for any person to avigate any helicopter with- 20 in this state unless such helicopter is equipped with: 21 a. a flight data recorder; 22 b. a cockpit voice recorder; and 23 c. a terrain awareness and warning system. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02032-01-5 S. 2299 2 1 3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to aircraft used 2 exclusively in the governmental service of the United States, or used 3 exclusively in the service of the national guard or of one or more of 4 the civil departments of this state. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 6 it shall have become a law.